Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 3

Standards of Conduct

48-18-301. General standards for directors.

A director shall discharge all duties as a director, including duties as a member of a committee:

In good faith;

With the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances; and

In a manner the director reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the corporation.

In discharging such duties, a director is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

One (1) or more officers or employees of the corporation (or a subsidiary of the corporation) whom the director reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented;

Legal counsel, public accountants, or other persons as to matters the director reasonably believes are within the person's professional or expert competence; or

A committee of the board of directors of which the director is not a member, if the director reasonably believes the committee merits confidence.

A director is not acting in good faith if the director has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise permitted by subsection (b) unwarranted.

A director is not liable for any action taken as a director, or any failure to take any action, if the director performed the duties of the office in compliance with this section.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 8.30; 1994, ch. 776, § 32.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 506.

Law Reviews.

Corporate Directors [and Officers] Making Business Judgments in Tennessee: The Business Judgment Rule, 44 U. Mem. L. Rev. 455 (2013).

Delaware LLCs for Tennessee Lawyers? (Richard Spore), 35 Tenn. B.J. 27 (1999).

The Conundrum of Directors' Duties in Nearly Insolvent Corporations (Mike Roberts), 23 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 273 (1993).

48-18-302. Liability for unlawful distributions.

A director who votes for or assents to a distribution made in violation of § 48-16-401 or the charter is personally liable to the corporation for the amount of the distribution that exceeds what could have been distributed without violating such section or the charter if it is established that the director did not perform such director's duties in compliance with § 48-18-301. In any proceeding commenced under this section, a director has all of the defenses ordinarily available to a director.

A director held liable under subsection (a) for an unlawful distribution is entitled to contribution from:

Every other director who could be held liable under subsection (a) for the unlawful distribution; and

Each shareholder for the amount the shareholder accepted knowing the distribution was made in violation of § 48-16-401 or the charter.

A proceeding under this section is barred unless it is commenced within two (2) years after the date on which the effect of the distribution was measured under § 48-16-401.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 8.33; 1994, ch. 776, § 33; 1996, ch. 618, § 1; T.C.A. § 48-18-304; Acts 2012, ch. 1051, § 30.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 48-18-302 (Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 8.31), concerning director and officer conflict of interest, was repealed by Acts 2012, ch. 1051, § 30, effective January 1, 2013.